Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-458
Absence without leave.

Any member of the military forces who, without authority:

(1) Fails to go to his appointed place of duty at the time prescribed;

(2) Goes from that place; or

(3) Absents himself or remains absent from his unit, organization, or place of duty at which he is required to be at the time prescribed, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 58, p. 1576.